Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2116.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-1159 of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. For the purposes of this section, the term “cultivated meat”


means a meat or meat product that was produced from cultured animal


tissue produced from in vitro animal cell cultures outside of the


animal from which the cells were derived.



Req. No. 2958 Page 1


B. 1. It shall be unlawful for any person to manufacture,


sell, hold or offer for sale, or distribute any cultivated meat


product in this state.


2. Any person who violates the provisions of this subsection


shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor.


C. 1. A seller of food under Sections 1-1118, 1-1118.1, and 1-


1119 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes that sells or distributes


cultivated meat products in violation of subsection B of this


section shall be subject to all enforcement measures as provided by


rule of the State Department of Health.


2. The license of a seller of food may be suspended or revoked,


as provided by rule of the State Department of Health, upon the


conviction of an owner or an employee of the licensed seller of food


for a violation of subsection B of this section.


D. The State Department of Health may adopt rules as necessary


to implement this section.


E. Nothing in this section shall be construed as preventing any


federal, state, or local governmental entity or institution of


higher education, or a person that is partnered with a governmental


entity or institution of higher education as evidenced by a formal


agreement, from conducting research in this state regarding the


production of cultivated meat products.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 88, O.S.L. 2025


(63 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 1-1160), is amended to read as follows:

Req. No. 2958 Page 2


Section 1-1160. A. As used in this act section:


1. “Agricultural food animal” means any domesticated animal


belonging to the bovine, caprine, ovine, or porcine species, or any


domesticated chicken or turkey;


2. “Cultivated-protein food product” means a food product


having one or more sensory attributes that resemble a type of tissue


originating from an agricultural food animal but that, in lieu of


being derived from meat processing, is derived from manufacturing


cells or nonanimal sources, including processes in which one or more


stem cells are initially isolated from an agricultural food animal,


are grown in vitro, and may be manipulated, as part of a


manufacturing operation;


3. “Identifying meat term” means any word or phrase that


states, indicates, suggests, or describes a meat product and


includes any:


a. common name for the species of the agricultural food


animal subject to slaughter and processing, including


calf, chicken, cow, goat, hog, kid, lamb, pig,


poultry, sheep, or turkey,


b. any characteristic of a species of the agricultural


food animal subject to slaughter and processing,


including beef, broiler, cabrito, chevon, fryer, lamb,


mutton, pork, poulet, veal, or yearling, and



Req. No. 2958 Page 3


c. common name used to describe a major cut of a meat of


an agricultural food animal slaughtered and processed,


including a major meat cut or any other common name


that a reasonable purchaser would immediately and


exclusively associate with a meat product prepared for


sale in normal commercial channels, including bacon,


bologna, bone, brat, bratwurst, brisket, burger, butt,


chop, chuck, cold cut, cutlet, filet, flat iron,


frank, frankfurter, ham, hamburger, hock, hot dog,


jerky, liverwurst, loin, London broil, lunch meat, New


York strip, pepperoni, porterhouse, rib, ribeye,


roast, salami, sausage, shank, sirloin, sparerib,


tenderloin, or any comparable word or phrase;


4. 3. “Insect-protein food product” means a food product having


one or more sensory attributes that resemble a type of tissue


originating from an agricultural food animal but that, in lieu of


being derived from meat processing, is derived from manufacturing


insect parts;


5. 4. “Manufactured-protein food product” means a cultivated


protein food product, an insect-protein food product, or plant-


protein food product containing more than a trace amount of plant-


protein food products;


6. 5. “Plant-protein food product” means a food product having


one or more sensory attributes that resemble a type of tissue found

Req. No. 2958 Page 4


in a species of agricultural food animal but that, in lieu of being


derived from meat processing, is derived from manufacturing plant


parts; and


7. 6. “Qualifying term” means a word, compound word, or phrase


that would clearly disclose to a reasonable purchaser of meat


products that a food product is not a meat product including cell-


cultivated, cell-cultured, fake, grown in a lab, imitation, insect,


insect-based, insect protein, lab-created, lab-grown, meat-free,


meatless, plant, plant-based, vegan, vegetable, vegetarian, veggie,


or any comparable word or phrase.


B. No person shall falsely advertise or misbrand any food or


distribute, offer for sale, or sell any misbranded food.


C. A food shall be deemed to be falsely advertised or


misbranded if:


1. For any manufactured-protein food product that is labeled


with an identifying meat term, such manufactured-protein food


product is not labeled with a conspicuous and prominent qualifying


term in close proximity to the identifying meat term; or


2. For any manufactured-protein food product that is labeled


with an identifying meat term and offered for sale at a food


establishment, such manufactured-protein food product is not labeled


in a manner that is clearly and distinctly separate from any product


that is made from tissue originating from any agricultural food


animal.

Req. No. 2958 Page 5


D. A manufactured-protein food product is falsely advertised or


misbranded if:


1. All labeling or advertising for such manufactured-protein


food product that lists an identifying meat term does not include a


conspicuous and prominent qualifying term in close proximity to the


identifying meat term; or


2. For any manufactured-protein food product that is offered


for sale at a food establishment, such manufactured-protein food


product is not stored in a manner that:


a. keeps such product separate from tissue originating


from agricultural food animals, and


b. uses distinctive shelf tags or other posted


representations to identify and distinguish such


manufactured-protein food product from tissue


originating from agricultural food animals.


E. The Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry


shall investigate all credible complaints that food products are


falsely advertised or misbranded as meat products.


F. Any person who violates the provisions of this act section


shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor.


G. A manufacturer of food under Sections 1-1118, 1-1118.1, and


1-1119 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title that violates


this act section shall be subject to all enforcement measures as



Req. No. 2958 Page 6


provided by rule of the Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food,


and Forestry.


H. The Department State Board of Agriculture, Food, and


Forestry may adopt rules as necessary to implement this section.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2958 YG 1/15/2026 12:57:31 PM



































Req. No. 2958 Page 7